Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-402.02
Consolidation agreement; adoption; vote required.

The county board of each county proposing to enter into a consolidation agreement shall adopt the consolidation agreement by a majority vote of the board on the joint or concurrent resolution.

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 13.